Nebraska, session 109, LB1028.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1028 LB1028
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 54-2416, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
54-2416 Sections 54-2416 to 54-2438 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Livestock Waste Management Act.
Sec. 2. (1) Each large concentrated animal feeding operation, as
defined in 40 C.F.R. 122.23, as such regulation existed on January 1,
2026, shall register its nutrient management plan with the department and
shall update its plan annually thereafter. The plan and any supporting
documentation shall be made publicly available on the department's
website.
(2) For any acres where livestock waste or litter is applied
pursuant to a nutrient management plan, cover crops shall be planted
following application unless the field has perennial cover crops. The
establishment and maintenance for such cover crops shall be paid by the
entity implementing the nutrient management plan. When reasonably
possible, the entity implementing the nutrient management plan shall use
regenerative agricultural practices which minimize tillage, establish
living roots systems, armor the soil with increased plant matter build
up, increase bio-diversity, integrate livestock grazing systems, and
respect and restore a region's native ecosystem.
(3) For any acres where livestock waste or litter is applied
adjacent to a running waterway pursuant to a nutrient management plan, a
minimum thirty-foot perennial-grass buffer shall be established and
maintained between the area of application and the waterway. The
establishment and maintenance for such buffer shall be paid by the entity
implementing the nutrient management plan. The entity implementing the
nutrient management plan shall also annually compensate the landowner of
such buffer for production losses on such buffered acres prices as
determined by the department.
Sec. 3. Original section 54-2416, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-